New York, session 2025-2026, S2510.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Terry 2 Cooper autopsy accountability act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 674 of the county law, as amended by 4 chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 5 5. Notwithstanding section six hundred seventy of this article or any 6 other provision of law, the coroner, coroner's physician or medical 7 examiner shall promptly perform or cause to be performed an autopsy and 8 to prepare an autopsy report which shall include a toxicological report 9 and any report of any examination or inquiry with respect to any death 10 occurring within [his or her] such coroner's, coroner's physician's or 11 medical examiner's county to an incarcerated individual of a correction- 12 al facility as defined by subdivision three of section forty of the 13 correction law, whether or not the death occurred inside such facility. 14 For the purposes of this subdivision, in addition to anything else 15 required by law, an autopsy report shall include all photographs of the 16 body, microscopic slides, and post-mortem x-rays taken by or at the 17 direction of the person performing the autopsy, and all photographs, 18 microscopic slides, and post-mortem x-rays reviewed by the person 19 performing the autopsy in the course of their examination or in the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05959-05-5 S. 2510--A 2 1 course of their diagnosis of the cause of death and the means or manner 2 of death. 3 § 3. Subdivision 6 of section 677 of the county law, as amended by 4 chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 5 6. Notwithstanding section six hundred seventy of this article or any 6 other provision of law, the coroner, coroner's physician or medical 7 examiner shall promptly provide the [chairman] chairperson of the 8 correction medical review board and the commissioner of corrections and 9 community supervision with copies of any autopsy report, toxicological 10 report or any report of any examination or inquiry prepared with respect 11 to any death occurring to an incarcerated individual of a correctional 12 facility as defined by subdivision three of section forty of the 13 correction law within [his or her] their county; and shall promptly 14 provide the executive director of the justice center for the protection 15 of people with special needs with copies of any autopsy report, toxicol- 16 ogy report or any report of any examination or inquiry prepared with 17 respect to the death of any service recipient occurring while [he or 18 she] such person was a resident in any facility operated, licensed or 19 certified by any agency within the department of mental hygiene, the 20 office of children and family services, the department of health or the 21 state education department. If the toxicological report is prepared 22 pursuant to any agreement or contract with any person, partnership, 23 corporation or governmental agency with the coroner or medical examiner, 24 such report shall be promptly provided to the [chairman] chairperson of 25 the correction medical review board, the commissioner of corrections and 26 community supervision or the executive director of the justice center 27 for people with special needs, as appropriate, by such person, partner- 28 ship, corporation or governmental agency. For the purposes of this 29 subdivision, in addition to anything else required by law, an autopsy 30 report shall include all photographs of the body, microscopic slides, 31 and post-mortem x-rays taken by or at the direction of the person 32 performing the autopsy, and all photographs, microscopic slides, and 33 post-mortem x-rays reviewed by the person performing the autopsy in the 34 course of their examination or in the course of their diagnosis of the 35 cause of death and the means or manner of death. 36 § 4. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 37 have become a law and shall apply to all autopsies conducted on or after 38 such date.